Utah statutes.
63M-1-1502.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Advisory board" means the Utah Pioneer Communities Advisory Board
created in Section 63M-1-1503 within the office.
(2)  "Community" means a city, county, town, or any combination of these.
(3)  "Revitalization" means the process of engaging in activities to increase
economic activity while preserving and building upon a location's historically
significant characteristics.
